District of Columbia statutes.
1-1163.24

Duration of an inaugural committee.

An inaugural committee shall terminate no later than 45 days from the beginning of the term of the new Mayor or Chairman, except that the inaugural committee may continue to accept contributions necessary to retire the debts of the committee.

History

Apr. 27, 2012, D.C. Law 19-124, § 324, 59 DCR 1862